Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3404
Public defender; certain counties; appointment authorized.

(1) In a county having a population of less than thirty-five thousand inhabitants which does not have an elected public defender, the county board of such county may appoint a qualified attorney to serve as public defender for such county. In making the appointment and negotiating the contract, the county board shall comply with sections 23-3405 to 23-3408.

(2) Nothing in sections 23-3401 to 23-3403 or 29-3901 to 29-3908 shall be construed to apply to sections 23-3404 to 23-3408.

Laws 1986, LB 885, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1824;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 4.